Massachusetts, session 194th, H5416.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 53F½ of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Lynnfield, by and through its select
board, may appropriate funds from the Golf Enterprise Fund to the Recreation Capital Trust
Stabilization Fund for the purpose of funding large and/or long term capital projects,
improvements and turf replacement to the town’s synthetic turf fields, including all incidental
and related costs. The amounts appropriated from the Golf Enterprise Fund for this purpose shall
not exceed $100,000 annually and shall be in excess of the amounts required to pay the annual
costs of operating and maintaining the Reedy Meadow and King Rail Golf Courses, including
the payment of any debt service associated therewith.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1